Massachusetts, session 194th, S186.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 23A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 10A the following section:-
Section 10A ½. (a) The Massachusetts office of business development shall establish a
MassMade Program which shall identify, connect and support businesses that produce consumer
goods in the commonwealth, identify obstacles to conducting business in the commonwealth,
and act as a resource for consumers seeking consumer goods made in the commonwealth. The
Massachusetts office of business development may consult with and seek input from interested
stakeholders and shall work with entities including MassMade businesses, regional economic
development organizations, small business associations, chambers of commerce, the supplier
diversity office, the Massachusetts marketing partnership and the office of consumer affairs and
of 2

business regulations in order to collect and provide business and product information related to
MassMade businesses. All MassMade Program information shall be readily accessible and free
to the public.
(b) For purposes of this section, the term “MassMade business” shall mean any entity that
(1) produces a consumer good including, but not limited to, food and beverage products in the
commonwealth; (2) is headquartered in the commonwealth or has a principal place of business in
the commonwealth; (3) possesses a certificate of good standing from the department of revenue;
and (4) seeks to join the MassMade Program.
(c) The Massachusetts office of business development may expend such funds as may be
appropriate for the MassMade Program and as may be appropriated therefor. The Massachusetts
office of business development may accept federal funds or private gifts and grants to assist in
carrying out this section.
(d) The Massachusetts office of business development shall promulgate regulations
necessary for the administration of this section.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the
Massachusetts office of business development shall conduct a feasibility study on developing
and maintaining an internet-based system to facilitate the exchange of information for the
MassMade Program that shall include, but shall not be limited to, procurement requests by and
from entities involving products made in the commonwealth.
of 2